Nevada, session 83, AB162.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 179A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this
act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Director of the Department shall establish
within the Central Repository a statewide database of persons who
have been convicted under the laws of this State two or more times
of any one act or combination of acts that constitute domestic
violence pursuant to NRS 33.018.
2. To the extent the information is available, the statewide
database established pursuant to subsection 1 must make available
to a requester the following information relating to each person
identified pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) The full name and any alias used by the person;
(b) The date of birth;
(c) A physical description and recent photograph;
(d) A list of offenses described in subsection 1 for which the
person has been convicted, the date of conviction for each offense
and the punishment prescribed for each offense; and
(e) An indication as to whether the person was discharged,
placed on community supervision or released on parole or
mandatory supervision following the conviction of each offense.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
information contained in the statewide database is public
information. The statewide database shall not provide a requester
with confidential information relating to:
(a) The social security number, driver’s license number or
telephone number of the subject of the search; or
(b) The identity of any victim of the offenses described in
subsection 1.
4. Subject to the requirements of subsection 3, the Director of
the Department shall establish and maintain within the Central
Repository an Internet website to provide the public with access at
no charge to the information set forth in subsection 2 that is
contained in the statewide database established pursuant to
subsection 1. The Internet website must be maintained in a
manner that will allow the public to obtain such information for
each person included in the statewide database by providing:
(a) The name or any alias of the subject of the search; or
(b) Any other information concerning the identity or location
of the subject of the search that is deemed sufficient in the
discretion of the Department.
-
*AB162*

– 4 –
5. The Department shall, in a conspicuous manner, post on
the Internet website established pursuant to subsection 4 the
following information:
(a) Information concerning the process set forth in subsection
6 for a petition for the removal of information contained in the
statewide database and Internet website, including, without
limitation, the circumstances under which a petition for removal
will be granted; and
(b) Contact information for organizations in this State which
provide services to victims of domestic violence.
6. A person included in the statewide database and Internet
website established pursuant to this section may petition the
Director for the removal of his or her information from the
statewide database and Internet website. The Director shall grant
the petition if:
(a) Unless the person has been convicted three or more times
of an offense described in subsection 1, a court issues an order to
expunge or seal all records relating to a conviction of one of the
offenses described in subsection 1 and the removal of such records
would disqualify the person from inclusion in the statewide
database; or
(b) During the 7-year period preceding the date of the petition,
the person has not been convicted of an offense described in
subsection 1.
7. In establishing the statewide database and Internet website
required pursuant to this section, the Director shall:
(a) Consult with a representative of an organization which
provides services to victims of domestic violence across this State
regarding:
(1) The implementation of the statewide database and
Internet website; and
(2) The resources to be included on the Internet website
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 5; and
(b) To the extent feasible, use existing databases and systems.
8. The Department and the officers and employees thereof
and a law enforcement agency and the officers and employees
thereof are immune from criminal or civil liability for an act or
omission relating to information obtained, maintained or disclosed
pursuant to the provisions of this section, including, without
limitation, an act or omission relating to:
(a) The accuracy of the information in the statewide database
and Internet website; or
(b) The disclosure of or the failure to disclose information in
the statewide database and Internet website.
-
*AB162*

– 5 –
Sec. 3. Except as otherwise authorized pursuant to specific
statute, a person shall not use information obtained from the
statewide database or Internet website established pursuant to
section 2 of this act for any purpose related to any of the
following:
1. Insurance, including health insurance.
2. Loans.
3. Credit.
4. Employment.
5. Education, scholarships or fellowships.
6. Housing or accommodations.
7. Benefits, privileges or services provided by any business
establishment.
Sec. 4. Any person who uses information obtained from the
statewide database or Internet website established pursuant to
section 2 of this act in violation of the provisions of section 3 of
this act is liable in a civil action brought by or on behalf of a
person injured by the violation, for damages, attorney’s fees and
costs incurred as the result of the violation.
Sec. 5. NRS 179A.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179A.110 A record of criminal history or any records of
criminal history of the United States or another state obtained
pursuant to this chapter must be used solely for the purpose for
which the record was requested. No person who receives
information relating to records of criminal history pursuant to this
chapter or who receives information pursuant to federal laws or
regulations may disseminate the information further without express
authority of law or in accordance with a court order. This section
does not [prohibit] :
1. Prohibit the dissemination of material by an employee of the
electronic or printed media in a professional capacity for
communication to the public.
2. Apply to public information obtained from the statewide
database or Internet website established pursuant to section 2 of
this act.
Sec. 6. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
-
*AB162*

– 6 –
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
-
*AB162*

– 7 –
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 2 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
-
*AB162*

– 8 –
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 7. The Department of Public Safety shall not include
information concerning a person who would be eligible for inclusion
in the statewide database and Internet website established pursuant
to section 2 of this act, if before July 1, 2025, the Department would
be required to remove his or her information from the statewide
-
*AB162*

– 9 –
database and Internet website if the person filed a petition pursuant
to subsection 6 of section 2 of this act.
Sec. 8. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB162*